Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB135.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Sections 7703(a), 7704(d)(7) and 7716(a)(1) of Title 15 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes are amended to read:§ 7703. Corporations.(a) Members and purpose.--Corporations, productive and distributive, may be incorporated under this chapter, upon compliance with its requirements, by [five] three or more farmers, mechanics, laborers or other persons who have incorporated themselves together by written articles under section 7704 (relating to articles of incorporation) for the purpose of carrying on agricultural, horticultural, mining, quarrying, building, mechanical, manufacturing or commercial 123456789101112131415161718 business; for the purpose of manufacturing, cultivating, raising, trading or dealing in goods, wares, merchandise, chattels, grains, vegetables, roots, fruits and other produce or animals; or for the purpose of buying, selling, holding, leasing or improving lands, tenements or buildings.* * *§ 7704. Articles of incorporation.* * *(d) Content of articles.--The articles of incorporation shall be signed by the persons originally associating themselves together and shall state:* * *(7) The number of directors, which may not be less than [five] three, constituting the initial board of directors and the names and addresses of the persons who are to serve as directors until the first annual meeting of the members or until their successors are elected and take office.* * *§ 7716. Directors and officers.(a) Directors.--(1) The business of the corporation shall be managed by a board of not less than [five] three directors, who shall be natural persons. At least a majority of the board must be members. The first directors shall serve until the first annual meeting of the corporation, at which time their successors shall be elected by the members of the corporation. Thereafter, a director shall hold office for a term of not less than one year nor more than three years and until a successor is elected and qualified. In an election for directors, a member has the right to cast the number of 20250HB0135PN2233 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 votes equal to the number of directors to be elected; and the member may cast the whole number of votes for one director or may distribute them among several candidates. An election for a director shall be by secret ballot. A director may be elected to successive terms.* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0135PN2233 - 3 - 1234567